Utah statutes.
58-15-4.   Licensure requirements.
(1)  An applicant for a license under this chapter shall submit a written
application to the division, verified under oath, that the applicant is of
good moral character as it relates to the functions and responsibilities of
the practice of administration of a health facility.
(2)  After July 1, 1985, all new applicants are required to have, in addition
to Subsection (1), the education or experience requirements as established by
rule and as approved by the division.
(3)  The applicant shall pay a fee to the Department of Commerce determined by
it pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for admission to the examination, for an
initial license, and for a renewal license.
(4)  The applicant shall pass a written examination in subjects determined by
the board.  Upon passing the examination and payment of the license fee, the
board shall recommend issuance to the applicant of a license to practice as a
health facility administrator.
(5)  A temporary license may be issued without examination to a person who
meets the requirements established by statute and by rule for an
administrator.  The temporary license may be issued only to fill a position of
administrator that unexpectedly becomes vacant and may be issued for only a
single period not to exceed six months.
(6)  A license may be granted to an applicant who is a licensed nursing home
administrator in another state if the standards for licensure in the other
state are equivalent to those criteria set forth in Subsections (1) and (2),
and if the applicant is otherwise qualified.
